Utah statutes.
77-2-3.   Termination of investigative action.

Prior to the commencement of prosecution, the prosecutor may, without approval of a magistrate, authorize a termination of investigative action when it appears that further investigative action is not in the public interest.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

